Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1536.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Municipal street lighting improvement districts; consolidation; notice A. Notwithstanding section 48-616, Arizona Revised Statutes, beginning January 1, 2027 through January 1, 2030, a political subdivision with more than one municipal improvement district that is formed for the purpose of providing for the lighting of public streets or parks pursuant to section 48-615, 48-616 or 48-617, Arizona Revised Statutes, may by resolution consolidate existing lighting districts into a single municipal improvement district. B. At least sixty days before adopting a resolution to consolidate improvement districts as prescribed by subsection A of this section, the political subdivision shall provide notice of the proposed consolidation to all real property owners in the districts that are proposed for consolidation and shall provide for receiving comment from the public on the proposed consolidation. The notice must contain all of the following: 1. The geographic areas of the districts proposed for consolidation. 2. The date that the proposed consolidation would take effect if the resolution to consolidate is adopted by the political subdivision. 3. A notice that the improvement district tax rate may increase or decrease depending the outcome of the consolidation. 4. The new estimated tax rate for the consolidated lighting district. 5. The time and location for public comment on the proposed consolidation. C. On approval of the resolution to consolidate the lighting districts, the governing body of the political subdivision shall submit a copy of its resolution to the county recorder for recording. D. Any municipal improvement district that is formed for the purpose of providing for the lighting of public streets or parks as prescribed by subsection A of this section and that is established beginning January 1, 2027 through January 1, 2030 is eligible for consolidation pursuant to this section.